src/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
!! Quantifier inflection
!!

LEXICON Num-noruz
+Qnt+Adn:%>D1E1 K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN: N-noruz ;

LEXICON NumTag
+Qnt+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN: # ;

LEXICON DNUM
+Qnt+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN: # ;

LEXICON NNUM
+Qnt+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
