src/morphology/stems/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON quantifiers

и:и Num1  "one" ;
кӑт:кӑт Num1  "two" ;
хуӆум:хуӆум Num1  "three" ;
няӆ:няӆ Num1  "four" ;
вет:вет Num1  "five" ;
хут:хут Num1  "six" ;
ӆапӑт:ӆапӑт Num1  "seven" ;
нивӑӆ:нивӑӆ Num1  "eight" ;
яртъяӊ:яртъяӊ Num1  "nine" ;
яӊ:яӊ Num1  "ten" ;
сот:сот Num1  "hundred" ;
ҫюрӑс:ҫюрӑс Num1  "thousand" ;
